Utah statutes.
11-36-401.5.   Mediation.
(1)  In addition to the methods of challenging an impact fee under Section
11-36-401, a specified public agency may require a local political subdivision
or private entity to participate in mediation of any applicable fee.
(2)  To require mediation, the specified public agency shall submit a written
request for mediation to the local political subdivision or private entity.
(3)  The specified public agency may submit a request for mediation under this
section at any time, but no later than 30 days after the impact fee is paid.
(4)  Upon the submission of a request for mediation under this section, the
local political subdivision or private entity shall:
(a)  cooperate with the specified public agency in the selection of a
mediator; and
(b)  participate in the mediation process.
